California statutes. Civil Code
CAUTION – PESTICIDES ARE TOXIC CHEMICALS. The California Department of Pesticide Regulation and the United States Environmental Protection Agency allow the unlicensed use of certain pesticides based on existing scientific evidence that there are no appreciable risks if proper use conditions are followed or that the risks are outweighed by the benefits. The degree of risk depends upon the degree of exposure, so exposure should be minimized.

If within 24 hours following application of a pesticide, a person experiences symptoms similar to common seasonal illness comparable to influenza, the person should contact a physician, appropriate licensed health care provider, or the California Poison Control
System (1-800-222-1222).

For further information, contact any of the following: for Health Questions – the County Health Department (telephone number) and for Regulatory Information – the Department of Pesticide Regulation (916-324-4100).”
(D) The approximate date, time, and frequency with which the pesticide will be applied.

(E) The following notification:

“The approximate date, time, and frequency of this pesticide application is subject to change.”

(2) At least 48 hours prior to application of the pesticide to a separate interest, the association or its authorized agent shall provide individual notice to the owner and, if applicable, the tenant of the separate interest and notice to an
owner and, if applicable, the tenant occupying any adjacent separate interest that is required to be notified pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) (A) At least 48 hours prior to application of the pesticide to a common area, the association or its authorized agent shall, if practicable, post the written notice described in paragraph (1) in a conspicuous place in or around the common area in which the pesticide is to be applied. Otherwise, if not practicable, the association or its authorized agent shall provide individual notice to the owner and, if applicable, the tenant of the separate interest that is adjacent to the common area.

(B) If the pest poses an immediate threat to health and safety, thereby making compliance with notification prior to the pesticide application unreasonable, the association or its authorized agent shall post the written notice as soon
as practicable, but not later than one hour after the pesticide is applied.

(4) Notice to tenants of separate interests shall be provided, in at least one of the following ways:

(A) First-class mail.

(B) Personal delivery to a tenant 18 years of age or older.

(C) Electronic delivery, if an electronic mailing address has been provided by the tenant.

(5) (A) Upon receipt of written notification, the owner of the separate interest or the tenant may agree in writing or, if notification was delivered electronically, the tenant may agree through electronic delivery, to allow the association or authorized agent to apply a pesticide immediately or at an agreed upon time.

(B) (i) Prior to receipt of written notification, the association or authorized agent may agree orally to an immediate pesticide application if the owner or, if applicable, the tenant requests that the pesticide be applied before the 48-hour notice of the pesticide product proposed to be used.

(ii) With respect to an owner or, if applicable, a tenant entering into an oral agreement for immediate pesticide application, the association or authorized agent, no later than the time of pesticide application, shall leave the written notice specified in paragraph (1) in a conspicuous place in the separate interest or at the entrance of the separate interest in a manner in which a reasonable person would discover the notice.

(iii) If any owner or, if applicable, any tenant of a separate interest or an owner
or, if applicable, a tenant of an adjacent separate interest is also required to be notified pursuant to this subparagraph, the association or authorized agent shall provide that person with this notice as soon as practicable after the oral agreement is made authorizing immediate pesticide application, but in no case later than commencement of application of the pesticide.

(6) A copy of a written notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be attached to the minutes of the board meeting immediately subsequent the application of the pesticide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 19.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4780.

(a) In a community apartment project, condominium project, or stock cooperative, unless otherwise provided in the declaration, the association is responsible for the repair and maintenance of the common area occasioned by the presence of wood-destroying pests or organisms.

(b) In a planned development, unless a different maintenance scheme is provided in the declaration, each owner of a separate
interest is responsible for the repair and maintenance of that separate interest as may be occasioned by the presence of wood-destroying pests or organisms. Upon approval of the majority of all members of the association, pursuant to Section 4065, that responsibility may be delegated to the association, which shall be entitled to recover the cost thereof as a special assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4785.

(a) The association may cause the temporary, summary removal of any occupant of a common interest development for such periods and at such times as may be necessary for prompt, effective treatment of wood-destroying pests or organisms.

(b) The association shall give notice of the need to temporarily vacate a separate interest to the occupants and to the owners, not less than 15 days nor more than 30
days prior to the date of the temporary relocation. The notice shall state the reason for the temporary relocation, the date and time of the beginning of treatment, the anticipated date and time of termination of treatment, and that the occupants will be responsible for their own accommodations during the temporary relocation.

(c) Notice by the association shall be deemed complete upon either:

(1) Personal delivery of a copy of the notice to the occupants, and if an occupant is not the owner, individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040, of a copy of the notice to the owner.

(2) Individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040 to the occupant at the address of the separate interest, and if the occupant is not the owner, individual delivery pursuant to Section 4040, of a copy of the notice to the owner.

(d) For purposes of this section, “occupant” means an owner, resident, guest, invitee, tenant, lessee, sublessee, or other person in possession of the separate interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4790.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the declaration, a member is entitled to reasonable access to the common area for the purpose of maintaining the internal and external telephone wiring made part of the exclusive use common area of the member’s separate interest pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4145. The access shall be subject to the consent of the association, whose approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, and which may include the association’s approval of telephone wiring
upon the exterior of the common area, and other conditions as the association determines reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Association Governance [4800. - 5450.]



  ARTICLE 1. Association Existence and Powers [4800. - 4820.]

4800.

A common interest development shall be managed by an association that may be incorporated or unincorporated. The association may be referred to as an owners’ association or a community association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4805.

(a) Unless the governing documents provide otherwise, and regardless of whether the association is incorporated or unincorporated, the association may exercise the powers granted to a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, as enumerated in Section 7140 of the Corporations Code, except that an unincorporated association may not adopt or use a corporate seal or issue membership certificates in accordance with Section 7313 of the Corporations Code.

(b) The association, whether incorporated or unincorporated, may exercise the powers granted to an association in this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4820.

Whenever two or more associations have consolidated any of their functions under a joint neighborhood association or similar organization, members of each participating association shall be (a) entitled to attend all meetings of the joint association other than executive sessions, (b) given reasonable opportunity for participation in those meetings, and (c) entitled to the same access to the joint association’s records as they are to the participating association’s records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Board Meeting [4900. - 4955.]

4900.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Common Interest Development Open Meeting Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4910.

(a) The board shall not take action on any item of business outside of a board meeting.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 7211 of the Corporations Code, the board shall not conduct a meeting via a series of electronic transmissions, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, except as specified in paragraph (2).

(2) Electronic transmissions may be used as a method of conducting an emergency board meeting if all directors, individually or collectively, consent in writing to that action, and if the written consent or consents are filed with the minutes of the board meeting. These written consents may be transmitted electronically.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4920.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the association shall give notice of the time and place of a board meeting at least four days before the meeting.

(b) (1) If a board meeting is an emergency meeting held pursuant to Section 4923, the association is not required to give notice of the time and place of the
meeting.

(2) If a nonemergency board meeting is held solely in executive session, the association shall give notice of the time and place of the meeting at least two days prior to the meeting.

(3) If the association’s governing documents require a longer period of notice than is required by this section, the association shall comply with the period stated in its governing documents. For the purposes of this paragraph, a governing document provision does not apply to a notice of an emergency meeting or a meeting held solely in executive session unless it specifically states that it applies to those types of meetings.

(c) Notice of a board meeting shall be given by general delivery pursuant to Section 4045.

(d) Notice of a board meeting shall contain the
agenda for the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 183, Sec. 17.   (SB 745)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4923.

An emergency board meeting may be called by the president of the association, or by any two directors other than the president, if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen which require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and which of necessity make it impracticable to provide notice as required by Section 4920.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4925.

(a) Any member may attend board meetings, except when the board adjourns to, or meets solely in, executive session. As specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4090, a member of the association shall be entitled to attend a teleconference meeting or the portion of a teleconference meeting that is open to members, and that meeting or portion of the meeting shall be audible to the members in a location specified in the notice of the meeting.

(b) The board shall permit any member to speak at any meeting of the association or the board, except for meetings of the board held in executive session. A reasonable time limit for all members of the association to speak to the board or before a meeting of the association shall be established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4926.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or the association’s governing documents, a board meeting or meeting of the members may be conducted entirely by teleconference, without any physical location being held open for the attendance of any director or member, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The notice for each meeting conducted under this section includes, in addition to other required content for meeting notices, all of the following:

(A) Clear technical instructions on how
 to participate by teleconference.

(B) The telephone number and electronic mail address of a person who can provide technical assistance with the teleconference process, both before and during the meeting.

(C) A reminder that a member may request individual delivery of meeting notices, with instructions on how to do so.

(2) Every director and member has the same ability to participate in the meeting that would exist if the meeting were held in person.

(3) Any vote of the directors shall be conducted by a roll call vote.

(4) Any person who is entitled to participate in the meeting shall be given
 the option of participating by telephone.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a meeting at which ballots are counted and tabulated pursuant to Section 5120.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 203, Sec. 3.   (AB 648)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4930.

(a) Except as described in subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, the board may not discuss or take action on any item at a nonemergency meeting unless the item was placed on the agenda included in the notice that was distributed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4920. This subdivision does not prohibit a member or resident who is not a director from speaking on issues not on the agenda.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a director, a managing agent or other agent of the board, or a member of the staff of the board, may do any of the following:

(1) Briefly respond to statements made or questions posed by a person speaking at a meeting as described in subdivision (b) of Section 4925.

(2) Ask a question for clarification, make a brief announcement, or make a brief report on the person’s own activities, whether in response to questions posed by a member or based upon the person’s own initiative.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board or a director, subject to rules or procedures of the board, may do any of the following:

(1) Provide a reference to, or provide other resources for factual information to, its managing
agent or other agents or staff.

(2) Request its managing agent or other agents or staff to report back to the board at a subsequent meeting concerning any matter, or take action to direct its managing agent or other agents or staff to place a matter of business on a future agenda.

(3) Direct its managing agent or other agents or staff to perform administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out this section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board may take action on any item of business not appearing on the agenda distributed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4920 under any of the following conditions:

(1) Upon a determination made by a majority of the board present at the meeting that an emergency situation exists. An emergency situation
exists if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen by the board, that require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and that, of necessity, make it impracticable to provide notice.

(2) Upon a determination made by the board by a vote of two-thirds of the directors present at the meeting, or, if less than two-thirds of total membership of the board is present at the meeting, by a unanimous vote of the directors present, that there is a need to take immediate action and that the need for action came to the attention of the board after the agenda was distributed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4920.

(3) The item appeared on an agenda that was distributed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4920 for a prior meeting of the board that occurred not more than 30 calendar days before the date that action is taken on the item and, at the
prior meeting, action on the item was continued to the meeting at which the action is taken.

(e) Before discussing any item pursuant to subdivision (d), the board shall openly identify the item to the members in attendance at the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4935.

(a) The board may adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to consider litigation, matters relating to the formation of contracts with third parties, member discipline, personnel matters, or to meet with a member, upon the member’s request, regarding the member’s payment of assessments, as specified in Section 5665.

(b) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to
discuss member discipline, if requested by the member who is the subject of the discussion. That member shall be entitled to attend the executive session.

(c) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to discuss a payment plan pursuant to Section 5665.

(d) The board shall adjourn to, or meet solely in, executive session to decide whether to foreclose on a lien pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5705.

(e) Any matter discussed in executive session shall be generally noted in the minutes of the immediately following meeting that is open to the entire membership.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4950.

(a) The minutes, minutes proposed for adoption that are marked to indicate draft status, or a summary of the minutes, of any board meeting, other than an executive session, shall be available to members within 30 days of the meeting. The minutes, proposed minutes, or summary minutes shall be distributed to any member upon request and upon reimbursement of the association’s costs for making that distribution.

(b) The annual policy statement, prepared pursuant to Section 5310, shall inform the members of their right to obtain copies of board meeting minutes and of how and where to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4955.

(a) A member of an association may bring a civil action for declaratory or equitable relief for a violation of this article by the association, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, restitution, or a combination thereof, within one year of the date the cause of action accrues.

(b) A member who prevails in a civil action to enforce the member’s rights pursuant to this article shall be
entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, and the court may impose a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, except that each identical violation shall be subject to only one penalty if the violation affects each member equally. A prevailing association shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Member Meeting [5000. - 5000.]

5000.

(a) Meetings of the membership of the association shall be conducted in accordance with a recognized system of parliamentary procedure or any parliamentary procedures the association may adopt.

(b) The board shall permit any member to speak at any meeting of the membership of the association. A reasonable time limit for all members to speak at a meeting of the association shall be established by the
board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Member Election  [5100. - 5145.]

5100.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or provision of the governing documents, elections regarding assessments legally requiring a vote, election and removal of directors, amendments to the governing documents, or the grant of exclusive use of common area pursuant to Section 4600 shall be held by secret ballot in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article.

(2) An association shall hold an election for a seat on the board of directors in accordance with the procedures set forth in this article at the expiration of the corresponding director’s term and at least once every four years.

(b) This article
 also governs an election on any topic that is expressly identified in the operating rules as being governed by this article.

(c) The provisions of this article apply to both incorporated and unincorporated associations, notwithstanding any contrary provision of the governing documents.

(d) The procedures set forth in this article shall apply to votes cast directly by the membership, but do not apply to votes cast by delegates or other elected representatives.

(e) In the event of a conflict between this article and the provisions of the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) relating to elections, the provisions of this article
 shall prevail.

(f) Directors shall not be required to be elected pursuant to this article if the governing documents provide that one member from each separate interest is a director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Notwithstanding the secret balloting requirement in Section 5100, or any contrary provision in the governing documents, when, as of the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115, the number of qualified candidates is not more than the number of vacancies to be elected, as determined by the inspector or inspectors of the elections, the association may, but is not required to, consider the qualified candidates elected by acclamation if all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The association has held a regular election for the directors in the last three years. The three-year time period shall be calculated from the date ballots were due in the last full election to the start of voting for the proposed election.

(b) The association provided individual notice of the election and the procedure for nominating candidates as follows:

(1) Initial notice at least 90 days before the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115. The initial notice shall include all of the following:

(A) The number of board positions that will be filled at the election.

(B) The deadline for submitting nominations.

(C) The manner in which nominations can be submitted.

(D) A statement informing members that if, at the close of the time period for making nominations, there are the same number or fewer qualified candidates as
 there are board positions to be filled, then the board of directors may, after voting to do so, seat the qualified candidates by acclamation without balloting.

(2) A reminder notice between 7 and 30 days before the deadline for submitting nominations provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 5115. The reminder notice shall include all of the following:

(A) The number of board positions that will be filled at the election.

(B) The deadline for submitting nominations.

(C) The manner in which nominations can be submitted.

(D) A list of the names of all of the qualified candidates to fill the board positions as of the date of the reminder notice.

(E) A statement reminding members that if, at the close of the time period for making nominations, there are the same number or fewer qualified candidates as there are board positions to be filled, then the board of directors may, after voting to do so, seat the qualified candidates by acclamation without balloting. This statement is not required if, at the time the reminder notice will be delivered, the number of qualified candidates already exceeds the number of board positions to be filled.

(c) (1) The association provides, within seven business days of receiving a nomination, a written or electronic communication acknowledging the nomination to the member who submitted the nomination.

(2) The association provides, within seven business days of receiving a nomination, a written or electronic
 communication to the nominee, indicating either of the following:

(A) The nominee is a qualified candidate for the board of directors.

(B) The nominee is not a qualified candidate for the board of directors, the basis for the disqualification, and the procedure, which shall comply with Article 2 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 10, by which the nominee may appeal the disqualification.

(3) The association may combine the written or electronic communication described in paragraphs (1) and (2) into a single written or electronic communication if the nominee and the nominator are the same person.

(d) (1) The association permits all candidates to run if nominated, except for nominees disqualified for running as allowed or
 required pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 5105.

(2) If an association disqualifies a nominee pursuant to this subdivision, an association in its election rules shall also require a director to comply with the same requirements.

(e) The association board votes to consider the qualified candidates elected by acclamation at a meeting pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4900) for which the agenda item reflects the name of each qualified candidate that will be seated by acclamation if the item is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 770, Sec. 3.   (AB 1764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

(a) An association shall adopt operating rules in accordance with the procedures prescribed by Article 5 (commencing with Section 4340) of Chapter 3, that do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that if any candidate or member advocating a point of view is provided access to association media, newsletters, or internet websites during a campaign, for purposes that are reasonably related to that election, equal access shall be provided to all candidates and members advocating a point of view, including those not endorsed by the board, for purposes that are reasonably related to the election. The association shall not edit or redact any content from these communications, but may include a
 statement specifying that the candidate or member, and not the association, is responsible for that content.

(2) Ensure access to the common area meeting space, if any exists, during a campaign, at no cost, to all candidates, including those who are not incumbents, and to all members advocating a point of view, including those not endorsed by the board, for purposes reasonably related to the election.

(3) Specify the qualifications for candidates for the board and any other elected position, subject to subdivision (b), and procedures for the nomination of candidates, consistent with the governing documents. A nomination or election procedure shall not be deemed reasonable if it disallows any member from nominating themself for election to the board.

(4) Specify the voting power of each membership, the authenticity, validity, and effect of proxies, and the voting period for elections, including the times at which polls will open and close, consistent with the governing documents.

(5) Specify a method of selecting one or three independent third parties as inspector or inspectors of elections utilizing one of the following methods:

(A) Appointment of the inspector or inspectors by the board.

(B) Election of the inspector or inspectors by the members of the association.

(C) Any other method for selecting the inspector or inspectors.

(6) Allow the inspector or inspectors to appoint and oversee additional persons to verify signatures and to count and tabulate votes as the inspector or inspectors deem appropriate, provided that the persons are independent third parties who meet the requirements in subdivision (b) of Section 5110.

(7) Require retention of, as association election materials, both a candidate registration list and a voter list. The candidate list shall include names and addresses of individuals nominated as a candidate for election to the board of directors. The voter list shall include the name, voting power, and either the physical address of the voter’s separate interest, the parcel number, or both. The mailing address for the ballot shall be listed on the voter list if it differs from the
 physical address of the voter’s separate interest or if only the parcel number is used. The association shall permit members to verify the accuracy of their individual information on both lists at least 30 days before the ballots are distributed. The association or member shall report any errors or omissions to either list to the inspector or inspectors who shall make the corrections within two business days.

(b) An association shall disqualify a person from a nomination as a candidate for not being a member of the association at the time of the nomination. An association shall disqualify a nominee if that person has served the maximum number of terms or sequential terms allowed by the association. A director who ceases to be a member shall be disqualified from continuing to serve as a director.

(1) This subdivision does not restrict a developer from making a nomination of a nonmember candidate consistent with the voting power of the developer as set forth in the regulations of the Department of Real Estate and the association’s governing documents.

(2) If title to a separate interest parcel is held by a legal entity that is not a natural person, the governing authority of that legal entity shall have the power to appoint a natural person to be a member for purposes of this article.

(c) Through its bylaws or election operating rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) only, an association may disqualify a person from nomination as a candidate pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), an association may require a nominee for a board seat, and a director during their board tenure, to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments, which are consumer debts subject to validation. If an association requires a nominee to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments, it shall also require a director to be current in the payment of regular and special assessments.

(2) An association may disqualify a person from nomination as a candidate if the person, if elected, would be serving on the board at the same time as another person who holds a joint ownership interest in the same separate interest parcel as the person and the other person is either properly nominated for the current election or an incumbent director.

(3) An association may disqualify a nominee if that person has been a member of the association for less than one year.

(4) An association may disqualify a nominee if that person discloses, or if the association is aware or becomes aware of, a past criminal conviction that would, if the person was elected, either prevent the association from purchasing the insurance required by Section 5806 or terminate the association’s existing insurance coverage required by Section 5806 as to that person should the person be elected.

(d) An association may disqualify a person from nomination for nonpayment of regular and special assessments, but may not disqualify a nominee for nonpayment of fines, fines renamed as assessments,
 collection charges, late charges, or costs levied by a third party. The person shall not be disqualified for failure to be current in payment of regular and special assessments if either of the following circumstances is true:

(1) The person has paid the regular or special assessment under protest pursuant to Section 5658.

(2) The person has entered into and is in compliance with a payment plan pursuant to Section 5665.

(e) An association shall not disqualify a person from nomination if the person has not been provided the opportunity to engage in internal dispute resolution pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5900) of Chapter 10.

(f) If an association
 disqualifies a nominee pursuant to this section, an association in its election rules shall also require a director to comply with the same requirements.

(g) Except as provided in subdivision (i), notwithstanding any other law, the rules adopted pursuant to this section may provide for the nomination of candidates from the floor of membership meetings or nomination by any other manner. Those rules may permit write-in candidates for ballots.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, the rules adopted pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Prohibit the denial of a ballot to a member for any reason other than not being a member at the time when ballots are distributed.

(2) Prohibit the denial of a ballot to a person with general power of attorney for a member.

(3) Require the ballot of a person with general power of attorney for a member to be counted if returned in a timely manner.

(4) Require the inspector or inspectors of elections to deliver, or cause to be delivered, at least 30 days before an election, to each member both of the following documents:

(A) The ballot or ballots.

(B) A copy of the election operating rules. Delivery of the election operating rules may be accomplished by any of the following methods:

(i) Posting the election operating
 rules to an internet website and including the corresponding internet website address on the ballot together with the phrase, in at least 12-point type: “The rules governing this election may be found here:”

(ii) Individual delivery.

(iii) Election operating rules adopted pursuant to this section shall not be amended less than 90 days prior to an election.

(i) Notwithstanding an association’s governing documents, the association may adopt an election operating rule that allows an association to utilize an inspector or inspectors of elections, as specified in Section 5110, to conduct an election by electronic secret ballot, except for an election regarding regular or special assessments, as provided for in Chapter 8
 (commencing with Section 5600).

(1) An election operating rule adopted pursuant to this subdivision
 shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following purposes:

(A) Permitting a member to change their preferred method of voting from electronic secret ballot to written ballot or written ballot to electronic secret ballot no later than 90 days before an election.

(B) Requiring an electronic secret ballot and a written ballot to contain the same list of items being voted on.

(C) (i) For an election operating rule where a member is permitted to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot to vote by written ballot, requiring the association to mail a written ballot only to a member who has opted out of voting by electronic secret ballot or for whom the association does not have an email address required to vote by electronic secret ballot.

(ii) For an election operating rule where a member who is permitted to opt into voting by electronic secret ballot, requiring the association to send an electronic secret ballot only to a member who has opted into voting by electronic secret ballot.

(D) Requiring the association to maintain a voting list identifying which members will vote by electronic secret ballot and which members will vote by written ballot, and include information on the procedures to either opt out of or opt into voting by electronic secret ballot, as applicable, in the annual statement prepared pursuant to Section 5310.

(E) Requiring a member who votes by electronic secret ballot to provide a valid email address to the association.

(F) Prohibiting nomination of candidates from the floor of membership meetings, notwithstanding subdivision (g).

(2) An electronic secret ballot may be accompanied by or contained in an electronic individual notice in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4040.

(3) (A) The association shall deliver individual notice of the electronic secret ballot to each member 30 days before the election and shall contain instructions on both of the following:

(i) How to obtain access to that internet-based voting system.

(ii) How to vote by electronic secret ballot.

(B) Delivery of the individual notice described in subparagraph (A)
 may be accomplished by electronic submission to an address, location, or system designated by the member.

(4) For an election operating rule where members are permitted to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot to vote by written ballot, the association shall provide individual notice, delivered pursuant to Section 4040, at least 30 days before the deadline to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot, of all of the following:

(A) The member’s current voting method. 

(B) If the member’s voting method is by electronic secret ballot and the association has an email
 address for the member, the email address of the member that will be used for voting by electronic secret ballot. 

(C) An explanation that the member is required to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot if the member elects to vote by written secret ballot. 

(D) An explanation of how a member may opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot.

(E) The deadline by which the member is required to opt out of voting by electronic secret ballot if the member elects to exercise that right.
